Hawaii statutes.
[§91-4.3] Price. (a) The lieutenant
governor shall sell the Hawaii administrative rules index and its supplements
at prices which as nearly as practicable will reimburse the State for all costs
incurred for printing, publication, and distribution.

(b) All money received from the sale of the
Hawaii administrative rules index and its supplements shall be deposited in the
state general fund. [L 1979, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next